Utah statutes.
17B-1-1203.   Hearing on a validation petition.
(1)  Upon the filing of a validation petition, the district court shall enter
an order setting a date, time, and place for a hearing on the validation
petition.
(2)  A hearing under Subsection (1) may not be held less than 21 days after
the filing of the validation petition.
